Tennessee, session 114, SB0739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-123(a), is amended by
deleting "thirty (30) days" and substituting "forty-five (45) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0739
002733
- 1 -